Utah statutes.
35A-3-610.   Legal representation at hearings.

(1)  A party may be represented by legal counsel at any hearing held under this part.

(2)  At the request of the department it is the duty of the attorney general or the county attorney to represent the department in any proceeding commenced under this part.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 90, 2003 General Session

